test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_VVW_ikwe_gt-glossing.yaml
     1+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: ndakwenyshiba
     1+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: ndakwenyshidig
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: ndakwensshiba
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: ndakwensshidig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: gdakwenyshiba
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: gdakwenyshidig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: gdakwensshiba
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: gdakwensshidig
     X+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: dakwenyshiba
     X+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: dakwenyshidig
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: dakwensshiba
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: dakwensshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 7
     1+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+4: ndakwenyshan
     1+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: ndakwenyshing
     1+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: ndakwenyshag
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+4: ndakwensshan
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: ndakwensshing
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: ndakwensshag
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+4: gdakwenyshan
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: gdakwenyshing
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: gdakwenyshag
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+4: gdakwensshan
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: gdakwensshing
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: gdakwensshag
     3+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+4: dakwenyshan
     3+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: dakwenyshing
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+4: dakwensshan
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: dakwensshing
     X+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+4: dakwenyshan
     X+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: dakwenyshing
     X+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: dakwenyshag
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+4: dakwensshan
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: dakwensshing
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: dakwensshag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6
     1+kwe+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt: ndakwenynaanba
     1+kwe+NA+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ndakwenynaandig
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt: ndakwensnaanba
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ndakwensnaandig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt: gdakwenynaanba
     2+kwe+NA+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdakwenynaandig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt: gdakwenywaaba
     2+kwe+NA+Con+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdakwenywaadig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt: gdakwensnaanba
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdakwensnaandig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt: gdakwenswaaba
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdakwenswaadig
     3+kwe+NA+Con+3+4+Prt: dakwenyniwba
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt: dakwensniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 7
     1+kwe+NA+Con+1+Pl+4: ndakwenynaanin
     1+kwe+NA+Con+1+Pl+Loc: ndakwenynaaning
     1+kwe+NA+Con+1+Pl+Pl: ndakwenynaanig
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+1+Pl+4: ndakwensnaanin
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Loc: ndakwensnaaning
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Pl: ndakwensnaanig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+1+Pl+4: gdakwenynaanin
     2+kwe+NA+Con+1+Pl+Loc: gdakwenynaaning
     2+kwe+NA+Con+1+Pl+Pl: gdakwenynaanig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+2+Pl+4: gdakwenywaan
     2+kwe+NA+Con+2+Pl+Loc: gdakwenywaang
     2+kwe+NA+Con+2+Pl+Pl: gdakwenywaag
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+1+Pl+4: gdakwensnaanin
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Loc: gdakwensnaaning
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Pl: gdakwensnaanig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+2+Pl+4: gdakwenswaan
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Loc: gdakwenswaang
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Pl: gdakwenswaag
     3+kwe+NA+Con+2+Pl+4: dakwenywaan
     3+kwe+NA+Con+2+Pl+Loc: dakwenywaang
     3+kwe+NA+Con+3+4+4: dakwenyniwan
     3+kwe+NA+Con+3+4+Loc: dakwenyniing
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+2+Pl+4: dakwenswaan
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Loc: dakwenswaang
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+3+4+4: dakwensniwan
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+3+4+Loc: dakwensniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6, 7
     1+kwe+NA+Con+Prt+4: ndakwenybaniin
     1+kwe+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: ndakwenybaniing
     1+kwe+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: ndakwenybaniig
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+Prt+4: ndakwensbaniin
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: ndakwensbaniing
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: ndakwensbaniig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Prt+4: gdakwenybaniin
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: gdakwenybaniing
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: gdakwenybaniig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Prt+4: gdakwensbaniin
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: gdakwensbaniing
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: gdakwensbaniig
     3+kwe+NA+Con+Prt+4: dakwenybaniin
     3+kwe+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: dakwenybaniing
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+Prt+4: dakwensbaniin
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: dakwensbaniing
     X+kwe+NA+Con+Prt+4: dakwenybaniin
     X+kwe+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: dakwenybaniing
     X+kwe+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: dakwenybaniig
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+Prt+4: dakwensbaniin
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: dakwensbaniing
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: dakwensbaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: ndakwemshinaa
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: gdakwemshinaa
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: gdakwemshiwaa
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4: dakwemshini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: ndakwemshiba
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: ndakwemshidig
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: gdakwemshiba
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gdakwemshidig
     X+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: dakwemshiba
     X+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: dakwemshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 7
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: ndakwemshan
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: ndakwemshing
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: ndakwemshag
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: gdakwemshan
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: gdakwemshing
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: gdakwemshag
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: dakwemshan
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: dakwemshing
     X+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: dakwemshan
     X+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: dakwemshing
     X+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: dakwemshag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: ndakwemnaanba
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ndakwemnaandig
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: gdakwemnaanba
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdakwemnaandig
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: gdakwemwaaba
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdakwemwaadig
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Prt: dakwemniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 7
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: ndakwemnaanin
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: ndakwemnaaning
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: ndakwemnaanig
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: gdakwemnaanin
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: gdakwemnaaning
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: gdakwemnaanig
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: gdakwemwaan
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: gdakwemwaang
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: gdakwemwaag
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: dakwemwaan
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: dakwemwaang
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+3+4+4: dakwemniwan
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Loc: dakwemniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6, 7
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: ndakwembaniin
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: ndakwembaniing
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: ndakwembaniig
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: gdakwembaniin
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: gdakwembaniing
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: gdakwembaniig
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: dakwembaniin
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: dakwembaniing
     X+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: dakwembaniin
     X+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: dakwembaniing
     X+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: dakwembaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6
     1+kwe+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: ndakwewshinaanba
     1+kwe+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ndakwewshinaandig
     2+kwe+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gdakwewshinaanba
     2+kwe+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdakwewshinaandig
     2+kwe+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gdakwewshiwaaba
     2+kwe+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdakwewshiwaadig
     3+kwe+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt: dakwewshinwiba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 7
     1+kwe+NA+Pej+1+Pl+4: ndakwewshinaanin
     1+kwe+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: ndakwewshinaaning
     1+kwe+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: ndakwewshinaanig
     2+kwe+NA+Pej+1+Pl+4: gdakwewshinaanin
     2+kwe+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gdakwewshinaaning
     2+kwe+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gdakwewshinaanig
     2+kwe+NA+Pej+2+Pl+4: gdakwewshiwaan
     2+kwe+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gdakwewshiwaang
     2+kwe+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gdakwewshiwaag
     3+kwe+NA+Pej+2+Pl+4: dakwewshiwaan
     3+kwe+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: dakwewshiwaang
     3+kwe+NA+Pej+3+4+4: dakwewshinwan
     3+kwe+NA+Pej+3+4+Loc: dakwewshiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6, 7
     1+kwe+NA+Pej+Prt+4: ndakwewshibniin
     1+kwe+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: ndakwewshibniing
     1+kwe+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: ndakwewshibniig
     2+kwe+NA+Pej+Prt+4: gdakwewshibniin
     2+kwe+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: gdakwewshibniing
     2+kwe+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: gdakwewshibniig
     3+kwe+NA+Pej+Prt+4: dakwewshibniin
     3+kwe+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: dakwewshibniing
     X+kwe+NA+Pej+Prt+4: dakwewshibniin
     X+kwe+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: dakwewshibniing
     X+kwe+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: dakwewshibniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6, 7
     1+kwe+NA+1+Pl+Prt+4: ndakwenaanbaniin
     1+kwe+NA+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ndakwenaanbaniing
     1+kwe+NA+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ndakwenaanbaniig
     2+kwe+NA+1+Pl+Prt+4: gdakwenaanbaniin
     2+kwe+NA+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdakwenaanbaniing
     2+kwe+NA+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdakwenaanbaniig
     2+kwe+NA+2+Pl+Prt+4: gdakwewwaabniin
     2+kwe+NA+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdakwewwaabniing
     2+kwe+NA+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdakwewwaabniig
     3+kwe+NA+2+Pl+Prt+4: dakwewwaabniin
     3+kwe+NA+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: dakwewwaabniing
     3+kwe+NA+3+4+Prt+4: dakwenwibniin
     3+kwe+NA+3+4+Prt+Loc: dakwenwibniing
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+4: kwenyshibniin
     kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: kwenyshibniing
     kwe+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: kwenyshibniig
     kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: kwensshibniin
     kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: kwensshibniing
     kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: kwensshibniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: ndakwenymishnaa
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: ndakwensmishnaa
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: gdakwenymishnaa
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: gdakwenymishwaa
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: gdakwensmishnaa
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: gdakwensmishwaa
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4: dakwenymishni
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4: dakwensmishni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: ndakwenymishba
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: ndakwenymishdig
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: ndakwensmishba
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: ndakwensmishdig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: gdakwenymishba
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gdakwenymishdig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: gdakwensmishba
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gdakwensmishdig
     X+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: dakwenymishba
     X+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: dakwenymishdig
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: dakwensmishba
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: dakwensmishdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 7
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+4: ndakwenymishan
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: ndakwenymishing
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: ndakwenymishag
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+4: ndakwensmishan
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: ndakwensmishing
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: ndakwensmishag
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+4: gdakwenymishan
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: gdakwenymishing
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: gdakwenymishag
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+4: gdakwensmishan
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: gdakwensmishing
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: gdakwensmishag
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+4: dakwenymishan
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: dakwenymishing
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+4: dakwensmishan
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: dakwensmishing
     X+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+4: dakwenymishan
     X+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: dakwenymishing
     X+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: dakwenymishag
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+4: dakwensmishan
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: dakwensmishing
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: dakwensmishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: ndakwenyminaanba
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ndakwenyminaandig
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: ndakwensminaanba
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ndakwensminaandig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: gdakwenyminaanba
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdakwenyminaandig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: gdakwenymiwaaba
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdakwenymiwaadig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: gdakwensminaanba
